Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5658
Commission; meetings; quorum.

The commission shall hold at least four meetings a year, at times and places fixed by the commission. At least one meeting each year shall be held at a site other than Lincoln or Omaha. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 9.